Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2922
Certificate of good standing or authorization.

(1) The Secretary of State, upon application and payment of the required fee, shall furnish a certificate of good standing for a limited cooperative association if the records filed in the office of the Secretary of State show that the Secretary of State has filed articles of organization, the limited cooperative association is in good standing, and there has not been filed articles of dissolution.

(2) The Secretary of State, upon application and payment of the required fee, shall furnish a certificate of authorization for a foreign limited cooperative association if the records filed in the office of the Secretary of State show that the Secretary of State has filed a certificate of authority, has not revoked the certificate of authority, and has not filed a notice of cancellation pursuant to section 21-29,108.

(3) Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of good standing or authorization issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association is in good standing or is authorized to transact business in this state.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 22;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 4.